fa_IR.aff
;P = Past Particles
;V = Present form of Verbs
;N = Noun
;n = Numbers
;A = Adverb
;L = Livings
;a=Verb; but appending an alef makes an Adverb
SET	UTF-8

SFX	n	Y	3
SFX	n	0	م	.
SFX	n	0	می	.
SFX	n	0	مین	.


SFX	P	Y	6
SFX	P	0	م	.
SFX	P	0	ی	.
SFX	P	0	یم	.
SFX	P	0	ید	.
SFX	P	0	ند	.
SFX	P	0	نش	.

PFX	P	Y	10
PFX	P	0	ب	.
PFX	P	ا	بی	.
PFX	P	0	ن	.
PFX	P	0	باز	.
PFX	P	0	بر	.
PFX	P	0	در	.
PFX	P	0	فرا	.
PFX	P	0	فرو	.
PFX	P	0	وا	.
PFX	P	0	ور	.

PFX	V	Y	10
PFX	V	0	ب	.
PFX	V	ا	بی	.
PFX	V	0	ن	.
PFX	V	0	باز	.
PFX	V	0	بر	.
PFX	V	0	در	.
PFX	V	0	فرا	.
PFX	V	0	فرو	.
PFX	V	0	وا	.
PFX	V	0	ور	.


SFX	P	Y	3
SFX	P	0	ن	.
SFX	P	0	ه/N	.
SFX	P	0	نی/N	.

SFX	V	Y	6
SFX	V	0	م	.
SFX	V	0	ی	.
SFX	V	0	د	.
SFX	V	0	یم	.
SFX	V	0	ید/P	.
SFX	V	0	ند	.

SFX	V	Y	3
SFX	V	0	ش/N	.
SFX	V	0	ه/N	.
SFX	V	0	نده/N	.

PFX	V	Y	4
PFX	V	0	ب	.
PFX	V	0	ن	.
PFX	V	0	م	.
PFX	V	0	می‌‌	.

SFX	N	Y	6
SFX	N	0	م	[^ه]
SFX	N	0	ت	[^ه]
SFX	N	0	ش	[^ه]
SFX	N	0	ام	[ه]
SFX	N	0	ات	[ه]
SFX	N	0	اش	[ه]

SFX	N	Y	3
SFX	N	0	مان	.
SFX	N	0	تان	.
SFX	N	0	شان	.

SFX	N	Y	2
SFX	N	0	ی	[^ه]
SFX	N	0	یی	[^ه]

SFX	N	Y	4
SFX	N	ه	گی	.
SFX	N	ه	گان	.
SFX	N	ه	گانی	.
SFX	N	ه	گانه	.

SFX	A	Y	3
SFX	A	0	ست	[وا]
SFX	A	0	ی	.
SFX	A	0	یی	.

SFX	A	Y	1
SFX	A	ه	گی	.

SFX	L	Y	2
SFX	L	0	ان/N	[^وا]
SFX	L	0	یان/N	[وا]

SFX	a	Y	1
SFX	a	0	ا/A	.
